Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 12. Savings Associations Law
§ 81-12-83.
Board of directors to manage business and exercise powers of capital stock association; election of members; term of office; qualifications; oath; vacancies.

The business of a capital stock association shall be managed and its powers exercised by a board of directors. The board shall consist of not less than five (5) adult natural persons who shall be elected at the annual meeting of stockholders in the following manner:

At each election for directors every shareholder entitled to vote at such election shall have the right to vote, in person or by proxy, the number of shares owned by him for as many persons as there are directors to be elected and for whose election he has a right to vote.

The term of office of the directors shall be for one (1) year; provided that when the board of directors shall consist of nine (9) or more members, in lieu of electing the whole number of directors annually, the articles of incorporation may provide that the directors be divided into either two (2) or three (3) classes, each class to be as nearly equal in number as possible, the term of office of directors of the first class to expire at the first annual meeting of the shareholders after their election; that of the second class to expire at the second annual meeting after their election; and that of the third class, if any, to expire at the third annual meeting after their election. At each annual meeting after such classification, the number of directors equal to the number of the class whose term expires at the time of such meeting shall be elected to hold office until the second succeeding annual meeting, if there be two (2) classes, or until the third succeeding annual meeting, if there be three (3) classes. No classification of directors shall be effective prior to the first annual meeting of shareholders.

Every director must, during his whole term of service, be a citizen of the United States, and at least three-fifths (3/5) of the directors must have resided in this state for at least one (1) year preceding their election and must be residents therein during their continuance in office. No person shall be eligible for election or shall serve as a director or officer of a capital stock association who has been convicted of a criminal offense. A director or officer shall automatically cease to be a director when he is adjudicated a bankrupt or convicted of a criminal offense. However, no action of the board of directors shall be invalidated through the participation of such director in such action unless challenge is made to such director’s vote prior to such action. Each director shall, in his own name, own capital stock in, or have a deposit relationship with, the association on an unencumbered basis as follows:

For stock associations under Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in assets, stock ownership in the institution or its holding company of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) in market value at time of purchase; or

For mutual associations under Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in assets, a Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollar ($2,500.00) deposit relationship; or

For stock associations over Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in assets, stock ownership in the institution or its holding company of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in market value at the time of purchase; or

For mutual associations over Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) in assets a Five Thousand Dollar ($5,000.00) deposit relationship.

For associations that cross the Fifty Million Dollar ($50,000,000.00) threshold, the commissioner shall allow a reasonable period for the directors to comply with the ownership interest requirement.

Each director, upon assuming office, shall take an oath that he will, so far as the duty devolves on him, diligently and honestly administer the affairs of such capital stock association and will not knowingly violate or permit to be violated, any of the provisions of this chapter, and a written copy of such oath shall be filed with the commissioner.

The board of directors of each capital stock association shall hold meetings as set forth in the bylaws of the association.

Vacancies on the board of directors may be filled at a meeting by the stockholders called for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 24; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 43; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 43; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 43; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 75; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-85.
Bonding of association’s officers, attorneys, employees, agents and directors.

Each association shall provide and maintain a fidelity bond covering its officers, attorneys, employees, agents and directors when performing the duties of officers or employees, in the form and amount required by the commissioner, but in no event less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). No bond coverage will be required of any agent which is a financial institution insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Such bonds shall provide that a cancellation thereof either by the surety or by the insured shall not become effective unless and until thirty (30) days’ notice in writing first shall have been given to the commissioner, unless he shall have approved such cancellation earlier.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 24; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 43; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 44; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 44; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 76; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-87.
Fiduciary relationship of directors and officers; disclosure of personal interests; restrictions governing conduct; penalty.

Directors and officers occupy a fiduciary relationship to the association of which they are directors or officers, and no director or officer shall engage or participate, directly or indirectly, in any business or transaction conducted on behalf of or involving the association, which would result in a conflict of his own personal interests with those of the association which he serves. Without limitation by any of the specific provisions of any of the subsections hereof, the commissioner may require the disclosure by directors, officers and employees of any personal interest, directly or indirectly, in any business or transactions on behalf of or involving the association and of their control of or active participation in enterprises having activities related to the business of the association. The following restrictions governing the conduct of directors and officers expressly are specified, but such specification is not to be construed in any manner as excusing such persons from the observance of any other aspect of the general fiduciary duty owed by them to the association which they serve:

From and after January 1, 1979, no officer or director of an association shall hold office as a director or officer of another thrift institution the principal office of which is located in the association’s primary lending area.

No director of an association shall receive remuneration as director except reasonable fees for service as a director or for service as a member of a committee of directors, except that nothing herein contained shall be deemed to prohibit or in any way to limit any right of a director who is also an officer or employee of or attorney for the association to receive compensation for service as an officer, employee or attorney.

Loans aggregating fifteen percent (15%) of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus may be made by any association to any director or executive officer thereof, as defined in Regulation O promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, less existing direct and indirect liabilities thereto, upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, provided, such loan is made on substantially the same terms and conditions extended to other borrowers for comparable transactions. Any association may lend to any such director or executive officer thereof, upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, not more than twenty percent (20%) of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of the association, less the amount of existing direct and indirect liabilities, when secured; or when the portion thereof in excess of any amount loaned under the first provision hereof is secured by obligations of the United States government, the State of Mississippi, and the levee districts, counties, road districts, school districts, and municipalities of the State of Mississippi, obligations of any other state of the United States and other bonds of recognized character and standing, which are the subject of daily newspaper market quotations, provided such loan shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the market or par value (whichever is less) of the bonds or obligations offered as security. Any association may lend to any executive officer or director thereof upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, such amount as is safe and proper, when secured by warehouse receipts or shippers’ order bills of lading representing actual existing values, provided the amount loaned shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the market value of the commodities representing the actual existing values, and loans of this nature shall be made payable on demand so that the security held therefor may be sold on any date and the proceeds thereof applied to the payment of the loan. However, an association’s board of directors may, as shown in its minutes, give to an association officer the authority to make secured or unsecured loans to an executive officer or director of such association, without receiving the board’s prior approval, in an amount that, when aggregated with the amount of all other extensions of credit to that person and to all related interests of that person, does not exceed the greater of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or five percent (5%) of the association’s unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus.

Loans and discounts by an association to a director or executive officer thereof secured in full by funds on deposit in time or savings accounts with the lending association to the credit of the borrower shall not be restricted to the fifteen percent (15%) or twenty percent (20%) limitations herein prescribed.

The limitations of this section shall not apply where an executive officer or director shall bona fide purchase from the association at a reasonable price real or personal property acquired by the association in payment of debts due the association, provided such transactions are approved by a majority of the board of directors, such approval to be shown in their minutes; and, in cases where loans are made by branch offices, the sum total of loans made by any branch or branches and its parent association to such executive officer or director shall be computed as against the total capital stock and surplus of the parent association and its branch or branches. Loans heretofore made to executive officers or directors may be renewed or extended if in accord with sound banking practice.

However, no association shall extend credit to any director or executive officer thereof, in an amount that, when aggregated with all other extensions of credit to that person and to all related interests of that person, exceeds Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) without documented prior affirmative approval of a majority of its directors.

No director or officer shall have any interest, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of a loan or investment or of a purchase or sale made by the association, unless such loan, investment, purchase or sale is authorized expressly by resolution of the board of directors, and unless such resolution is approved by vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the directors authorized by the association, any interested director taking no part in such vote.

No director or officer shall have any interest, directly or indirectly, in the purchase at less than its face value of any evidence of a savings account, deposit or other indebtedness issued by the association.

No director, association or officer thereof shall require, as a condition to the granting of any loan or the extension of any other service by the association, that the borrower or any other person undertake a contract of insurance or any other agreement, or understanding with respect to the furnishing of any other goods or services, with any specific company, agency or individual.

No officer or director acting as proxy for a member or stockholder of record of an association shall exercise, transfer or delegate such vote or votes in any consideration of a private benefit or advantage, direct or indirect, accruing to himself, nor shall he surrender control or pass his office to any other for any consideration of a private benefit or advantage, direct or indirect. The voting rights of members, stockholders and directors shall not be subject to sale, barter, exchange or similar transaction, either directly or indirectly. Any officer or director who violates the provisions of this section shall be held accountable to the association for any increment and subject to the criminal penalty below.

No director or officer shall solicit, accept or agree to accept, directly or indirectly, from any person other than the association any gratuity, compensation or other personal benefit for any action taken by the association or for endeavoring to procure any such action.

Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be punishable by not more than five (5) years’ imprisonment or a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 25; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 44; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, Ch. 52, § 45; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 45; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 77; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 42; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-89.
Deposit of association funds; approval by directors.

No association shall deposit any of its funds, except with a depository approved by a vote of a majority of the directors authorized by the association, any director who is an officer, partner, director, or trustee of the depository so designated taking no part in such vote.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 26; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 45; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 46; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 46; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 78; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-91.
Indemnification of director, officer or employee for expenses of action to which he is made a party by reason of his position.

Any person may be indemnified or reimbursed by the association for reasonable expenses, including, but not limited to, attorney’s fees actually incurred by him in connection with any action, suit or proceeding, instituted or threatened, judicial or administrative, civil or criminal, to which he is made a party by reason of his being or having been a director, officer or employee of an association; however, no person shall be so indemnified or reimbursed, nor shall he retain any advancement or allowance for indemnification which may have been made by the association in advance of final disposition, in relation to such action, suit or proceeding in which and to the extent that he finally shall be adjudicated to have been guilty of a breach of good faith, to have been negligent in the performance of his duties or to have committed an action or failed to perform a duty for which there is a common law or a statutory liability. In addition, a person may, with the approval of the commissioner, be so indemnified or reimbursed for:

Amounts paid in compromise or settlement of any action, suit or proceeding, including reasonable expenses incurred in connection therewith; or

Reasonable expenses, including fines and penalties, incurred in connection with a criminal or civil action, suit or proceeding in which such person has been adjudicated guilty, negligent or liable, if it shall be determined by the board of directors and the commissioner that such person was acting in good faith and in what he believed to be the best interests of the association and without knowledge that the action was illegal and if such indemnification or reimbursement is approved at an annual or special meeting of the members or stockholders by a majority of the votes eligible to be cast. Amounts paid to the association, whether pursuant to judgment or settlement by any person within the meaning of this section, shall not be indemnified or reimbursed in any case.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 27; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 46; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 47; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 47; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 79; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 44; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-93.
Management contracts.

No association shall make any management contract with any person or persons extending for more than three (3) years. Contracts in excess of one (1) year shall first be approved by the commissioner. No such contract shall permit an association to be managed on a commission basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 28; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 47; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 48; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 48; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 80; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-95.
Records; minutes of meetings; business transactions.

Every association shall keep at the home office correct and complete minutes of the proceedings and meetings of members, stockholders, directors and the executive committee. Complete records of all business transacted at the home office shall be maintained at the home office, and control records of all business transacted at each branch office or agency shall be maintained at the home office, except as permitted below. However, any state savings association may cause any or all records at any time in its custody to be reproduced in a format of storage commonly used, whether electronic, imaged, magnetic, microphotographic, or otherwise, and any reproduction so made shall have the same force and effect as the original thereof and be admitted in evidence equally with the original.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(1); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 48; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 49; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 49; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 81; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 46; Laws, 2000, ch. 335, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 48, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-97.
Records; branch offices; agents.

Each branch office shall keep detailed records of all transactions at such branch office and shall furnish full control records to the home office, except as permitted below.

Each agent of an association shall keep an original record of each transaction of business of the association and shall report promptly to the home office. Complete detailed permanent records of such transactions are not required to be maintained at such agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(2, 3); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 49; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 50; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 50; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 82; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 47; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-99.
Records; maintenance by means of data processing services.

An association which determines to maintain any of its records by means of data processing services shall so notify the commissioner, in writing, at least ninety (90) days prior to the date on which such maintenance of records will begin. Such notification shall include identification of the records to be maintained by data processing services and a statement as to the location at which such records will be maintained. Any contract, agreement or arrangement made by an association pursuant to which data processing services are to be performed for such association shall be in writing and shall expressly provide that the records to be maintained by such services shall at all times be available for examination and audit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(4); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 50; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 51; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 51; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 83; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 48; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-101.
Records; forms and accounting principles; closing of books; description of assets.

Every association shall use such forms and observe such accounting principles and practices as the commissioner may require from time to time.

Every association shall close its books annually.

No association by any system of accounting or any device of bookkeeping shall, either directly or indirectly, enter any of its assets upon its books in the name of any other person, partnership, association or corporation or under any title or designation that is not truly descriptive of such assets.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(5-7); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 51; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 52; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 52; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 84; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 49; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-103.
Records; overvaluation of assets.

The commissioner, after a determination of value made in accordance with Section 81-12-177(8), may order that assets, individually or in the aggregate, to the extent that such assets are overvalued on an association’s books, be charged off, or that a special reserve or reserves equal to such overvaluation be set up by transfers from undivided profits or reserves.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(8, 9); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 52; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 53; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 53; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 85; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 50; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-105.
Records; real estate investments; appraisal.

An association shall not carry any real estate on its books at a sum in excess of the total amount invested by such association on account of such real estate, including advances, costs, and improvements but excluding accrued but uncollected interest.

Every association shall have appraised each parcel of real estate immediately following acquisition thereof. The report of each such appraisal shall be submitted in writing to the board of directors and shall be kept in the records of the association. In addition to his powers under Section 81-12-177(8) of this chapter, the commissioner may require the appraisal of real estate securing loans which are delinquent more than four (4) months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(10, 11); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 53; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 54; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 54; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 86; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 51; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-107.
Records; loan and investment.

Every association shall maintain complete loan and investment records in a manner prescribed by the commissioner. Detailed records necessary to make determinations of compliance by an association with the investment, liquidity, loan and other provisions of this chapter shall be maintained consistently and at all times, the record of each real estate loan or other secured loan or investment containing documentation to the satisfaction of the commissioner of the type, adequacy and completion of the security.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(12); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 54; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 55; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 55; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 87; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 52; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-109.
Records; membership and stockholder.

Every association shall maintain membership and stockholder records, which shall show the name and address of the member or stockholder, the status of the member as a savings account holder, or an obligor, or a savings account holder and obligor, and the date of membership or ownership of stock. In the case of members holding a savings account the association shall obtain a savings account contract containing the signature of each holder of such account or his duly authorized representative, and shall preserve such contract in the records of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(13); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 55; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 56; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 56; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 88; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 53; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-111.
Records; reproduction by photostatic, photographic or microfilming process.

Any association may cause any or all records kept by such association to be copied or reproduced by any photostatic, photographic or microfilming process which correctly and permanently copies, reproduces or forms a medium for copying or reproducing the original record on a film or other durable material, and such association may thereafter dispose of the original record. Any such copy or reproduction shall be deemed to be an original record for all purposes and shall be treated as an original record in all courts or administrative agencies for the purpose of its admissibility in evidence. A facsimile, exemplification or certified copy of any such copy or reproduction reproduced from a film record shall, for all purposes, be deemed a facsimile, exemplification or certified copy of the original record.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 29(14); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 56; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 57; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 57; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 89; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 54; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-113.
Reserves.

Every association shall set up and maintain the reserves required by the board and may set up and maintain such additional reserves as are permitted by this chapter. The commissioner shall fix the amount of each association’s separate reserve account to be set up and maintained for the sole purpose of absorbing losses (termed in this chapter “general reserve”), but in no event shall such amount of such general reserve be less than the amount required by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Transfers to general reserve shall be made at such time or times as set by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 30; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 57; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 58; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 58; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 90; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 55; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-115.
Savings liability of association to equal aggregate amount of savings accounts plus earnings; additions to accounts; responsibility of members for losses; assessment of accounts; declaration of earnings; preferences.

The savings liability of an association is not limited, but shall consist only of the aggregate amount of savings accounts of its members or savings account holders, plus earnings credited to such accounts, less redemption and withdrawal payments. Except as limited by the board of directors from time to time, a member or savings account holder may make additions to his savings accounts in such amounts and at such times as he may elect. The members or savings account holders of an association shall not be responsible for any losses which its savings liability shall not be sufficient to satisfy, and savings accounts shall not be subject to assessment. Earnings shall be declared in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Except as provided in Section 81-12-153, no association shall prefer one (1) of its savings accounts over any other savings account as to the right to participate in earnings. No preference between savings account members or savings account holders shall be created with respect to the distribution of assets upon voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution or winding up of an association. No association shall issue, sell, negotiate or advertise any type of savings account or debt security, except as authorized by this chapter, nor shall it contract with respect to any savings account or other account in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 31; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 58; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 59; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 59; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 91; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 56; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-117.
Savings accounts.

Savings accounts may be opened and held solely and absolutely in his own right by, or in trust or other fiduciary capacity for, any person, including an adult or minor individual, male or female, single or married, partnership, association, fiduciary, corporation or by a political subdivision or public or governmental unit, but only to the extent expressly authorized by the statutes of this state. Savings accounts shall be represented only by the account of each savings account holder on the books of the association, and such accounts or any interest therein shall be transferable only on the books of the association and upon proper written application by the transferee and upon acceptance by the association of the transferee as a savings account holder upon terms approved by the board of directors. The association may treat the holder of record of a savings account as the owner thereof for all purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 32(1); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 59; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 60; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 60; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 92; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 57; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-119.
Savings accounts; execution of contract by holder.

Each holder of a savings account shall execute a savings account contract setting forth any special terms and provisions applicable to such savings account and the ownership thereof and the conditions upon which withdrawals may be made, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 32(2); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 60; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 61; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 61; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 93; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 58; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-121.
Savings accounts; evidence of ownership.

Evidence of ownership of a savings account shall be issued in such form as approved by the commissioner by regulation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 32(3); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 61; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 62; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 62; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 94; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 59; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-123.
Savings accounts; lost or destroyed account books or certificates.

Upon the filing with an association by the holder of record as shown by the books of the association, or by his legal representative, of an affidavit to the effect that the account book or certificate evidencing his savings account with the association has been lost or destroyed, and that such account book or certificate has not been pledged or assigned in whole or in part, such association shall issue a new account book or certificate in the name of the holder of record, such evidence stating that it is issued in lieu of the one lost or destroyed, and the association shall in no way be liable thereafter on account of the original account book or certificate, provided that the board of directors shall, if in its judgment it is necessary, require a bond in an amount it deems sufficient to indemnify the association against any loss which might result from the issuance of such new account book or certificate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 32(4); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 62; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 63; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 63; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 95; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 60; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-125.
Savings accounts; inducements to open.

The commissioner shall by regulation determine the conditions under which merchandise, things of value or services performed outside the premises of an association may be furnished as an inducement for the opening or increase of any savings account.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 32(5); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 63; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 64; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 64; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 96; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 61; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 63, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-127.
Savings accounts; adverse claims to accounts.

Notice to any association doing business in this state of an adverse claim to an account on its books in the name of any savings account holder shall not be effectual to cause the association to recognize such adverse claimant unless such adverse claimant either procures a restraining order, injunction or other appropriate process against the association from a court of competent jurisdiction in a cause therein instituted by him wherein the savings account holder in whose name the account appears is made a party and served with summons, or shall execute to the association, in form and with sureties acceptable to it, a bond indemnifying it from any and all liability, loss, damage, costs and expenses for and on the account of the payment of such adverse claim.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 32(6); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 64; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 65; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 65; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 97; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 62; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 64, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-129.
Savings plans at educational institutions.

An association may contract with the proper authorities of any public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or institution of higher learning, or any public or charitable institution caring for minors, for the participation and implementation by the association in any school or institutional thrift or savings plan, and it may accept savings accounts at such a school or institution, either by its own collector or by any representative of the school or institution which becomes the agent of the association for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 33(1); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 65; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 66; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 66; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 98; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 63; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-131.
Payroll savings plans.

An association may contract with any employer with respect to the solicitation, collection and receipt of savings by payroll deduction to be credited to a designated account or accounts of his or its employee or employees who voluntarily may participate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 33(2); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 66; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 67; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 67; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 99; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 64; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 66, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-133.
Attorneys authorized to make withdrawals; revocation of authority.

Any association may continue to recognize the authority of an attorney in fact authorized in writing to manage or to make withdrawals either in whole or in part from the savings account of a member or savings account holder until it receives written notice or is on actual notice of the revocation of his authority. For the purposes of this section, written notice of the death or adjudication of incompetency of such savings account holder shall constitute written notice of revocation of the authority of his attorney. No such institution shall be liable for damages, penalty or tax by reason of any payment made in accord with this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 34; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 67; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 68; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 68; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 100; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 65; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 2001.